California statutes. Public Resources Code
In the event the board of directors proposes to submit a special tax, as provided in Section 50077 of the Government Code, and a bond issue for approval by the voters of the district, or a zone or zones within the district, both the special tax and the bond issue may be consolidated and may appear on the ballot as a single proposition if the special tax and the bond issue are for the same object or purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 565, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

5545.6.

Any tax imposed under Section 5545 by a district formed pursuant to Section 5506.5 shall be used exclusively for the acquisition of open-space, park, or recreation lands or for the development, operation, or maintenance of open-space, park, or recreation lands so acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 762.)
-------------------------------------------

5546.

A district may contribute money, in those amounts the board of directors, by resolution, finds to be proper, to the State Park and Recreation Commission or to any municipality, county, or other public corporation, district, or agency, for the purpose of assisting in the acquisition of lands within or outside of the district for the purposes specified in section 5541, or for improving the lands in the manner therein specified, when in the judgment of the board of directors the acquisition or improvement is so located and planned as to be of benefit to the district. A
 district may grant funds to a private nonprofit entity for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 321, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5547.

The board of directors shall act only by ordinance, resolution, or a motion duly recorded in the minutes of the meeting. The ayes and noes shall be taken upon the passage of all ordinances or resolutions, and entered upon the journal of the proceedings of the board.

An ordinance, resolution, or motion shall not be passed or become effective without the affirmative votes of at least a majority of all the members of the board.

The enacting clause of all ordinances passed by the board shall be in these words: “Be it ordained by the Board of Directors of the (giving the name)
 District.”

All resolutions and ordinances shall be signed by the president of the board and attested by the secretary, administrative secretary, or clerk, and all ordinances shall be published once within 30 days after adoption, in a newspaper of general circulation printed, published, and circulated in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5548.

The president shall preside over all meetings of the board. He shall sign all contracts and conveyances on behalf of the district after they have been approved by the board, and he shall perform such other duties as may be imposed upon him by the board.

In the absence of the president, or in the event of his inability to act, the vice president shall perform all the powers and duties of the president.

If both the president and vice president are absent or unable to act, the board may select a president pro tempore, who shall perform all the powers and duties of the president.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5549.

(a) The general manager has the following administrative and executive functions, powers, and duties. The general manager shall do all of the following:

(1) Enforce this article and all ordinances and regulations of the district.

(2) Appoint and remove subordinates, clerks, and other employees, and exercise supervision and control over all departments and offices of the district, subject to the personnel rules, civil service or merit system, and policies adopted by the board.

(3) Attend all meetings of the board unless excused by the board.

(4) Submit to the board for adoption any measures, ordinances, and regulations the general manager deems necessary or expedient.

(5) Enforce all terms and conditions imposed in favor of the district or its inhabitants in any contract and report any violations to the board or the police department, as appropriate.

(6) Prepare and submit the annual budget to the board and perform all other duties imposed by this article or by the board.

(b) (1) With the approval of the board, the general manager may bind the district, in accordance with board policy that has been adopted in an open meeting, and without advertising, for the payment for supplies,
 materials, labor, or other valuable consideration for any purpose, including new construction of a building, structure, or improvement, in amounts not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). All expenditures shall be reported to the board of directors at its next regular meeting.

(2) A district may, by action of the board in an open meeting, increase the amount by which the general manager may bind the district above the fifty-thousand-dollar ($50,000) limit established in paragraph (1). An increase made pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed an amount equal to 2 percent, for each fiscal year following the operative date of the last adjustment, of the amount in effect when the board’s action is adopted.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), in a district
 with a population of 200,000 or more, and with the approval of the board, the general manager may bind the district, in accordance with board policy that has been adopted in an open meeting, for the payment for equipment, supplies, and materials for any purpose, including new construction of a building, structure, or improvement, excluding labor and services, when the annual aggregate cost does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(2) This subdivision applies only to the procurement of tangible equipment, supplies, and materials and shall not be interpreted to authorize the general
 manager to bind the district for labor or services, in an amount not exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), that are customarily or historically performed by district employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 166, Sec. 6.   (AB 769)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5550.

(a) The Meyers-Milias-Brown Act, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, applies to all districts.

(b) A board of directors may adopt an ordinance establishing an employee relations system that may include, but is not limited to, a civil service system or a merit system.

(c) With the prior permission of the board of supervisors of the principal county, a board of directors may adopt an ordinance that makes the employees of the district subject to the employee relations system of the principal county. The board of directors may adopt an ordinance that withdraws the employees of the district
 from the employee relations system of the principal county. A district in which the employees of the district are subject to the employee relations system of the principal county shall receive employee relations services at cost from the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 581, Sec. 2.   (AB 1036)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5551.

The secretary of the board, the administrative secretary, or the clerk, as the case may be, shall countersign and affix the seal to all contracts and conveyances on behalf of the district, shall act as secretary to the board and keep a record of its proceedings, and shall perform such other duties as may be imposed upon him by the appointing authority or by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 362, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5552.

The controller is the custodian of the funds of the district and shall make payments by check or by warrant drawn upon the district’s depositories for obligations that have been first approved by a majority of the board of directors at a meeting of the board of directors. The board of directors also may, by resolution and under any terms and conditions which it may prescribe in the resolution, authorize the controller to pay demands against the district, without the prior, specific approval of the board, that are for any purpose for which an expenditure has been previously authorized in the district’s adopted budget and which do not exceed the amount of
 expenditure so authorized. Demands so paid shall be presented to the board of directors at the next regular meeting for its review and approval. If the funds of the district are maintained solely in the county treasury, the county auditor shall exercise the powers otherwise conferred by this section on the controller.

The board of directors shall by ordinance or resolution authorize signatories for checks or warrants drawn in payment of obligations and demands against the district. Authorized signatories shall be selected from members of the board of directors of the district, the general manager of the district, the administrative secretary, or any other officers and employees which may be designated by the board. 

The controller shall keep an account of all receipts and disbursements, and shall deposit all money received by him or her in a depository or depositories selected by the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

5552.1.

Notwithstanding Section 5552, the boards of directors of the Riverside County Regional Park and Open-Space District and the Sonoma County Agricultural Preservation and Open Space District may, by resolution, eliminate the requirement that demands against that respective district which are paid without the prior, specific approval of the board be presented to the board at the next regular meeting for its review and approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 132.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5553.

The controller shall install and maintain a system of auditing and accounting, which will at all times show the financial condition of the district, and he shall perform such other duties as may be imposed upon him by this article, the board, or the general manager. Payment of employee salaries and benefits and other recurring claims may be authorized annually by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

5553.5.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

5555.

The directors of the district, before assuming the duties of their office, shall take and subscribe an official oath, and file it in the office of the board. The official oath shall be in the form provided by law for official oaths of county officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5556.

The board may appoint, employ, or contract for the services of attorneys, consultants, advisers, and such other experts as they deem necessary, and shall authorize the appointment or employment by the general manager of such assistants, deputies, and other appointees and employees as may be deemed necessary by the board to carry out the purposes of this article, and the board shall determine the duties and compensation, or basis of compensation, of all such persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 455.)
-------------------------------------------

5557.

The board shall have a suitable office in the district where its maps, plans, documents, records, and accounts shall be kept, subject at all reasonable times and under reasonable regulations to public inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5557.1.

The board may authorize at any time the destruction or disposition of any duplicate record, paper, or document, the original or a permanent photographic reproduction of which is in the files of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 687.)
-------------------------------------------

5557.2.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5558.

(a) The board shall superintend, control, and make available to all of the inhabitants of the district, subject to its ordinances, rules, and regulations, all public parks, playgrounds, beaches, parkways, scenic drives, boulevards, open spaces, and other facilities for public recreation belonging to the district or under its control.

The board shall regulate, restrain, and control the kind of vehicles, and the time and conditions of travel or parking on such public parks, playgrounds, beaches, parkways, scenic drives, boulevards, open spaces, and other facilities for public recreation, and it
 shall employ a suitable police force and shall adopt all ordinances, rules, and regulations necessary for the administration, government, protection, and use of the property, improvements, and facilities belonging to the district or under its control.

The board shall, in general, do all acts necessary to the proper execution of the powers and duties granted to, and imposed upon, it by this article, and to manage and control the business and affairs of the district.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the board of any district organized pursuant to Sections 5506.5 and 5538.5 may designate and employ officers and employees of the county in which the district is located as the district police force required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 683, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5558.5.

(a) By ordinance, a board of directors may declare that an encroachment onto district land constitutes a nuisance.

(b) (1) Upon adopting an ordinance pursuant to subdivision (a), the board of directors may, by ordinance, establish a nuisance abatement procedure to abate an encroachment onto district land that constitutes a nuisance and to collect abatement and related administrative costs and penalties, including any costs incurred for providing notice or recording a nuisance abatement lien pursuant to this section.

(2) The nuisance abatement procedure shall do all of the following:

(A) (i) Require the district, upon initiating a nuisance abatement proceeding, to provide notice of the proceeding to any party who is responsible for the nuisance or who owns, or is in possession of, a parcel upon which the nuisance is located, created, caused, committed, or maintained.

(ii) In a nuisance abatement proceeding to obtain a nuisance abatement lien, the notice provided pursuant to this subparagraph shall be served in the same manner as summons in a civil action in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(iii) Notwithstanding clause (ii), in a nuisance abatement proceeding to obtain a nuisance abatement lien, if, after diligent search, a party who owns, or is in possession of, a parcel upon which the nuisance is located, created, caused, committed, or maintained cannot be
 found, the notice may be served by posting a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place on the parcel for a period of 10 days and publication of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the parcel is located pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code.

 (B) Require the district to provide a party who is responsible for the nuisance or who owns, or is in possession of, a parcel upon which the nuisance is located, created, caused, committed, or maintained with an opportunity to appear and be heard before the abatement of the nuisance by the district or the recordation of a nuisance abatement lien.

(3) The nuisance abatement procedure may authorize the board of directors to provide for the summary abatement of a nuisance, consistent with the requirements of paragraph (2), at the expense of a party who is responsible for the nuisance or who
 owns, or is in possession of, a parcel upon which the nuisance is located, created, caused, committed, or maintained.

(4) (A) The nuisance abatement procedure may authorize the board of directors to collect abatement and related administrative costs and penalties through a nuisance abatement lien against a parcel upon which the nuisance is located.

(B) The nuisance abatement lien shall be recorded in the county recorder’s office in the county in which the parcel is located and, from the date of recording, shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien.

(C) The nuisance abatement lien shall specify the amount of the lien, the name of the district on whose behalf the lien is imposed, the date of the abatement order, the street address, legal description, and assessor’s parcel number
 of the parcel upon which the lien is imposed, and the name and address of the party who owns the parcel upon which the nuisance is located.

(D) If the nuisance abatement lien is discharged, released, or satisfied, notice of the discharge containing the information specified in subparagraph (C) shall be recorded by the district.

(E) The nuisance abatement lien and the discharge, release, or satisfaction of the lien shall be indexed in the grantor-grantee index.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 6103 and 27383 of the Government Code or any other law, a county recorder may impose a fee on a district to reimburse the costs of processing and recording a nuisance abatement lien and providing notice pursuant to this section.

(d) A district may initiate a civil
 action to abate a nuisance in the name of the district, and, by the judgment in that action, the nuisance may be enjoined or abated and damages may be recovered, as provided in this section.

(e) A board of directors may, by ordinance, provide for the recovery of attorney’s fees by the prevailing party in any civil action or nuisance abatement proceeding to abate a nuisance.

(f) Section 5560 does not apply to an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 268, Sec. 1.   (AB 959)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5559.

The board may adopt regulations, and it shall cause the regulations made by it to be posted upon park or other property of the district to which they apply, and it shall cause them to be published at least once in a newspaper published in the county or counties within which the district is in whole or in part situated, and such posting and publication shall be sufficient notice to all persons.

The affidavit of the general manager or the secretary that the district rules and regulations have been so posted and published is prima facie evidence thereof. A copy of the rules and regulations, attested by any member of the board or by its
 secretary shall be prima facie evidence that the rules and regulations have been made by the board as provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 455.)
-------------------------------------------

5560.

(a) Violation of an ordinance, rule, or regulation adopted pursuant to this article is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment, unless the board provides that a violation of an ordinance, rule, or regulation is an infraction, that is punishable by:

(1) A fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for a first violation.

(2) A fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for a second violation of the same ordinance, rule, or regulation within one year.

(3) A fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional violation of the same ordinance, rule, or regulation within one year.

(b) A superior court of a county lying wholly or in part within the district is a proper court for trial of all prosecutions under this article for violations of an ordinance, rule, or regulation adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 36.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5560.1.

In order to protect property, improvements, and facilities of parks under its management or belonging to the district and to preserve the peace within such parks, the district board may confer, on uniformed park employees which it may designate, the authority to issue citations for misdemeanor and infraction violations of state law, city or county ordinances, or district regulations or ordinances, when the violation is committed within a district park and in the presence of the employee issuing the citation. The citations shall be issued in accordance with Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5560.5.

(a) A district may enact in its ordinances clauses which provide that if any person is arrested for a violation of the ordinance, and such person is not immediately taken before a magistrate, the arresting officer shall prepare in duplicate a written notice to appear in court, containing the name and address of such person, the offense charged, and the time and place where and when such person shall appear in court.

(b) The time specified in the notice to appear must be at least five days after such arrest.

(c) The place
 specified in the notice to appear shall be the court of the magistrate before whom the person would be taken if the requirement of taking an arrested person before a magistrate were complied with, or shall be an officer authorized by such court to receive a deposit of bail.

(d) The officer shall deliver one copy of the notice to appear to the arrested person, and the arrested person in order to secure release must give his written promise so to appear in court by signing the duplicate notice which shall be retained by the officer. Thereupon the arresting officer shall forthwith release the person arrested from custody.

(e) The officer shall, as soon as practicable, file the duplicate notice with the magistrate specified therein. Thereupon the magistrate shall fix the amount of bail which in his judgment, in accordance with the provisions of Section 1275 of the Penal Code, will be
 reasonable and sufficient for the appearance of the defendant and shall indorse upon the notice a statement signed by him in the form set forth in Section 815a of the Penal Code. The defendant may, prior to the date upon which he promised to appear in court, deposit with the magistrate the amount of bail thus set. Thereafter, at the time when the case is called for arraignment before the magistrate, if the defendant shall not appear, either in person or by counsel, the magistrate may declare the bail forfeited, and may in his discretion order that no further proceedings shall be had in such case.

Upon the making of such order that no further proceedings be had, all sums deposited as bail shall forthwith be paid into the county treasury for distribution pursuant to Section 1463 of the Penal Code.

(f) No warrant shall issue on such charge for the arrest of a person who has given such written promise to
 appear in court, unless and until he has violated such promise or has failed to deposit bail, to appear for arraignment, trial or judgment, or to comply with the terms and provisions of the judgment, as required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5560.6.

A district may enact in its ordinances clauses which prohibit any person from willfully violating his written promise to appear in court regardless of the disposition of the charge upon which he was orginally arrested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5560.7.

A district may further provide in its ordinance that when a person signs a written promise to appear at the time and place specified in the written promise to appear and has not posted bail as provided in Section 5560.5, the magistrate shall issue and have delivered for execution a warrant for his arrest within 20 days after his failure to appear as promised, or if such person promises to appear before an officer authorized to accept bail other than a magistrate and fails to do so on or before the date which he promised to appear, then, within 20 days after the delivery of such written promise to appear by the officer to a magistrate having jurisdiction over the offense.

When such person violates his promise to appear before an officer authorized to receive bail other than a magistrate, the officer shall immediately deliver to the magistrate having jurisdiction over the offense charged the written promise to appear and the complaint, if any, filed by the arresting officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5560.8.

A district may enact the foregoing as a separate and distinct ordinance which shall apply to all or one or more of its ordinances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5561.

The police appointed or employed by the board shall have, within the district for which they are appointed or employed, all the powers of police officers of municipal corporations except the power of serving and executing civil process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5561.5.

The board may provide by resolution or regulation for the care, restitution, sale, or destruction of unclaimed property in the possession of the district. Any resolution or regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall provide therein (1) that such unclaimed property shall be held by the district for a period of at least six months, (2) that thereafter such property will be sold at public auction to the highest bidder, and (3) that notice of such sale shall be given by the board at least five days before the time therefor by publication once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district.
 The board may dispose of any such property upon which no bid is made at any such sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

5561.6.

The district shall be primarily responsible for the prevention and suppression of all fires on any lands in its possession or control, excluding all lands of a district located within the exterior boundaries of any municipality or other fire protection district.

For the purposes of the prevention and suppression of fires on such lands, the board may enter into co-operative mutual aid agreements with the federal government, the State, any municipality, county or district, or any person, corporation or association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

5562.

The board may acquire, construct, improve, maintain, and operate golf courses, bathhouses, boathouses, tennis courts, gymnasiums, and other special amusements and forms of recreation, and it may acquire, construct, or complete all buildings, structures, waterways, lakes, equipment, and other necessary or convenient facilities.

It may fix and collect fees for the use by the public of any boats, bathing suits, lockers, golf courses, tennis courts, or other special facilities, services, or equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5563.

If, in the opinion of the board, any land or property owned by the district, or any interest therein, becomes unnecessary for the purposes of the district, the board may, subject to the provisions of Section 5540, sell such lands or property, or interest therein. When land or property is temporarily unnecessary for park or open-space purposes, it may be leased for other purposes for a term not exceeding 25 years with an express provision in the lease that should the board by ordinance determine to use the lands for park, open-space, or other district purposes, the lease shall thereby be terminated. The proceeds of any sale or lease of lands or property, or any interest
 therein, shall be used for and applied to such purposes of the district as the board may, by resolution, determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5563.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 5540 and 5563, the Board of Directors of the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District may, and the Board of Directors of the East Bay Regional Park District may, without obtaining the consent of the voters, lease real property for a term not exceeding 99 years. A lease entered into pursuant to this section shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by the affirmative votes of at least two-thirds of the members of the board, upon making an express finding that the purpose of the lease is for park or open-space purposes, or for an historic preservation, recreation, climate-resiliency, social equity, or agricultural purpose that is compatible with public use and enjoyment of the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 166, Sec. 8.   (AB 769)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5564.

(a) If it is necessary or advisable to acquire or construct any works, structures, or embankments, including nature-based and built, in order to protect the property of the district from damage by flood or storm waters, the board may acquire or construct those works, structures, or embankments.

(b) If the works, structures, or embankments are necessary or advisable not only to protect the property of the district, but other property not owned by the district as well, the board may enter into contracts with any flood control district or other municipal or public corporation, and may grant rights of way, for such periods of time as it shall determine, over the property of the district to such
 flood control district or other municipal or public corporation,
 whereby the flood control district or other municipal or public corporation may be permitted to construct such works, structures, or embankments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 166, Sec. 10.   (AB 769)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5565.

The legal title to all property acquired by the district under the provisions of this article shall immediately and by operation of law vest in the district, and shall be held by the district in trust for, and is dedicated and set apart for, the uses and purposes set forth in this article. The board may hold, use, acquire, manage, occupy, and possess such property, as provided in this article.

The board may take conveyances or other assurances for all property acquired by it under the provisions of this article in the name of the district, to and for the uses and purposes expressed in this article, and it may institute and maintain all
 actions and proceedings, or suits at law or in equity, necessary or proper in order to carry out the provisions of this article, or to enforce, maintain, protect, or preserve all rights, privileges, and immunities created by or acquired in pursuance of this article. In all courts, actions, suits, or proceedings, the board may sue, appear, and defend, in person or by attorneys and in the name of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5565.5.

(a) With the consent of the board of directors of a district, an irrevocable offer of dedication of real property or any interest in real property for any of the purposes authorized by this article may be made to the district pursuant to this section. The offer of dedication shall be executed, acknowledged, and recorded in the same manner as a conveyance of real property. The offer of dedication, when recorded in the office of the county recorder, shall be irrevocable
 and may be accepted at any time by the board of directors of the district.

(b) An offer of dedication may be terminated, and the right to accept the offer abandoned, by a majority vote of the board of directors of the district and only if the board of directors makes both of the following findings:

(1) The offer of dedication was never accepted and, therefore, termination or abandonment of the offer does not constitute a conveyance of an interest in real property dedicated for park or open-space purposes.

(2) Now, or in the future, the district cannot effectively use the real property, or interest in real property, that would be conveyed by the offer of dedication for park or open-space purposes.

(c) The procedure prescribed by this section is
 alternative to any other procedure authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   (AB 1962)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5566.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide a district with authority to impose special taxes. A district may impose special taxes pursuant to the procedures set forth in Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. In exercising that authority, a district may establish a zone or zones and a rate of tax for each zone, which is to be applied uniformly to all taxpayers within the zone. All revenue from a tax levied in a zone shall be expended in connection with land and facilities that are located in that zone, including a reasonable amount thereof allocated for general administrative
 expenses of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 205, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5567.

Every director and every other officer named in this article who is, in any manner interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded, or to be awarded, by the board, or in the profits to be derived from such a contract, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and conviction of a person under this section shall work a forfeiture of his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5568.

For the purpose of acquiring, constructing, or completing any improvement or improvements authorized by this article, or for the purpose of acquiring any land or other property necessary or useful therefor, the board of directors may incur an indebtedness not to exceed 5 percent of the assessed valuation of the real and personal property situated in the district or in any zone established pursuant to Section 5566 for the purpose of levying a tax to pay all sums coming due to repay the indebtedness. The district may issue bonds for the indebtedness under and in full compliance with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with
 Section 43600) of Chapter 4 of Division 4 of Title 4 of the Government Code. The provisions of that chapter, as they may exist from time to time and insofar as they may be applicable, shall govern all district bond issues, and the board of each district is the legislative branch of the district, and authorized to do all acts and things which may be done by the legislative branch of cities, towns, and municipal corporations in the incurring of indebtedness and the issuance and sale of bonds.

Taxes for the payment of the bonds shall be levied and collected in the manner provided in this article.

The bonds issued under this section shall be signed by the president of the board and the treasurer of the district, and countersigned by the secretary. The coupons shall be signed by the treasurer. If any officers whose signatures appear on the bonds or coupons cease to be officers before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser,
 those signatures or countersignatures are, nevertheless, valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if the officers had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 565, Sec. 4.   Effective September 19, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

5569.

For the purpose of paying all sums coming due for principal and interest on all bonds of the district, there shall be levied and collected each year a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on such bonds and, also, that part of the principal which will become due before the time for fixing the next general tax levy. If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of bonds is made to begin more than one year after the date of the issuance of the bonds, the tax shall be levied and collected each year, to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due, and, also, to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

The taxes in this section required to be levied and collected, shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for district purposes, and shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as other district taxes are collected, and shall be used for no purpose other than the payment of said bonds and accruing interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5570.

On or before the second Monday in August of each year, the county auditor of each county in which any portion of a district is located, shall transmit to the board of directors of the district and to the board of supervisors of each county in which the district is located, a statement in writing showing the total value of all real and personal property within the district and within his respective county, which value shall be ascertained from the assessment books of the county as equalized and corrected by the board of supervisors of the county.

The board of directors of the district shall, on or before the last Tuesday of August of
 each year, cause to be prepared and submitted to the board of supervisors of each county in which any portion of the district is located, a detailed statement showing separately:

(a) The estimated amount of money that will be required for the payment of principal and interest upon bonds and other indebtedness of the district before the time for fixing the next general tax levy.

(b) The estimated amount of money that will be required for the operation, maintenance, upkeep, and repair of the parks, playgrounds, parkways, scenic drives, boulevards, and property of the district, and to defray the expenses of administering the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5571.

The board of supervisors of each county in which any part of the district is located, shall, at the time of making the general tax levy in each year, levy a tax upon all the real and personal property within the district and within their respective county at a rate sufficient to meet the proportion of taxes necessary to be raised in the county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest of the bonds and other indebtedness of the district and all other requirements of the district as shown by the estimate of the board of directors of the district. The amount of taxes to be raised in each county shall be in the same proportion as the assessed valuation of the taxable
 property in the district within the county is to the assessed valuation of all property in the district.
